Washington statutes.
RCW 43.03.130

Travel expenses of prospective employees.

Any state office, commission, department or institution may agree to pay the travel expenses of a prospective employee as an inducement for such applicant to travel to a designated place to be interviewed by and for the convenience of such agency. Travel expenses authorized for prospective employees called for interviews shall be payable at rates in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 as now existing or hereafter amended. When an applicant is called to be interviewed by or on behalf of more than one agency, the authorized travel expenses may be paid directly by the authorizing personnel department or agency, subject to reimbursement from the interviewing agencies on a pro rata basis.

In the case of both classified and exempt positions, such travel expenses will be paid only for applicants being considered for the positions of director, deputy director, assistant director, or supervisor of state departments, boards or commissions; or equivalent or higher positions; or engineers, or other personnel having both executive and professional status. In the case of the state investment board, such travel expenses may also be paid for applicants being considered for investment officer positions. In the case of four-year institutions of higher education, such travel expenses will be paid only for applicants being considered for academic positions above the rank of instructor or professional or administrative employees in supervisory positions. In the case of community and technical colleges, such travel expenses may be paid for applicants being considered for full-time faculty positions or administrative employees in supervisory positions.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 453; 2000 c 153 s 1; 1993 c 93 s 1; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34 s 96; 1967 ex.s. c 16 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.

Effective date—Severability—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34: See notes following RCW 2.08.115.